District of Columbia statutes.
49-205

Penalty for selling, pawning, injuring, or retaining public property.

Any officer or soldier who shall sell, dispose of, pawn or pledge, willfully destroy or injure, or retain after proper demand made, any public property issued under the provisions of this title, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by imprisonment for not exceeding 2 months, or by a fine not exceeding $100, or by both; and it is hereby made the duty of the judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon information filed or complaint, made under oath, to issue process for the arrest of the offender, and to cause him to be brought before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to be dealt with according to the provisions of this section.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328, § 34
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 633, ch. 146, § 33
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 49-211.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-205.
1973 Ed., § 39-505.